Massachusetts, session 194th, H157.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 4 of chapter 94G of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking in line 231 after the word "misleading;" the
following:-
"(2) a prohibition on advertising, marketing and branding by means of television, radio,
internet, billboard or print publication unless at least 85 per cent of the audience is reasonably
expected to be 21 years of age or older, as determined by reliable, up-to-date audience
composition data"
and inserting in place thereof the following:- ";(2a) a prohibition on advertising,
marketing and branding by means of billboards; (2b) a prohibition on advertising, marketing, and
of 2

branding by means of television, radio, internet, or print publication unless at least 85 per cent of
the audience is reasonably expected to be 21 years of age or older, as determined by reliable, up-
to-date audience composition data"
SECTION 2. Said section 4 of said chapter 94G of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2020 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking in line 258 after the word "unless" the
following:- "at least 85 per cent of the audience is reasonably expected to be 21 years of age or
older, as determined by reliable, up-to-date audience composition data" and inserting in place
thereof the following:- "entry is restricted to those 21 years of age or older."
SECTION 3. Said section 4 of said chapter 94G of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2020 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 265 after the word "a" the word
"conspicuous."
of 2